en: Hair extension texture: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Curly; Deep curly; Deep wave; Dreads/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Silky straight; Spring twist; Straight; Water wave; Wavy; Wet & wavy; Yaki/kinky straight; Other
ro-RO: Textura extensiilor de păr: Afro creț/Afro twist; Blow-out; Ondulat lejer; Boho loc; Foarte creț; Creț; Foarte creț; Ondulat strâns; Dreaduri/Locs; Buclă italiană; Jerry curl; Creț kinky; Ondulat strâns lejer; Ondulat lejer; Drept și mătăsos; Spring twist; Drept; Water wave; Ondulat; Umed & ondulat; Drept Yaki/kinky; Altele
el: Υφή extension μαλλιών: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Σγουρά; Deep curly; Deep wave; Rasta/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Μεταξένια ίσια; Spring twist; Ίσια; Water wave; Σπαστά; Wet & wavy; Yaki/kinky straight; Άλλο
it: Texture delle extension per capelli: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Ricci; Deep curly; Deep wave; Dread/loc; Ricci italiani; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Lisci setosi; Spring twist; Lisci; Water wave; Mossi; Wet & wavy; Yaki/lisci crespi; Altro
fi: Hiustenpidennysten rakenne: Afro kinky / afro twist; Föönaus; Kevyt laine; Boho locs; Tiukka kihara; Kihara; Syvä kihara; Syvä laine; Rastat/dreadlocks; Italialainen kihara; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loiva syvä laine; Loiva laine; Silkkisen suora; Spring twist; Suora; Vesilaine; Laineikas; Wet & wavy; Yaki / kinky straight; Muu
ru: Текстура наращенных волос: Афро-кудри / афро-твист; Вытянутые (blow-out); Объемная волна; Бохо-локоны; Спиральные; Кудрявые; Мелкие кудри; Глубокая волна; Дреды / локоны; Итальянские кудри; Джерри-кёрл; Мелкие афро-кудри; Свободная глубокая волна; Свободная волна; Шелковистые прямые; Спринг-твист; Прямые; Водная волна; Волнистые; Мокрые и волнистые; Яки / жесткие прямые; Другое
nl: Haarextensie textuur: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Curly; Deep curly; Deep wave; Dreads/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Silky straight; Spring twist; Steil; Water wave; Golvend; Wet & wavy; Yaki/kinky straight; Overig
tr: Saç uzatma dokusu: Afro kıvırcık/afro burgu; Fönlü; Hafif dalgalı; Bohem rasta; Buket kıvırcık; Kıvırcık; Yoğun kıvırcık; Yoğun dalgalı; Rasta; İtalyan kıvırcığı; Jerry kıvırcığı; Aşırı kıvırcık; Gevşek yoğun dalgalı; Gevşek dalgalı; İpeksi düz; Spring twist; Düz; Su dalgası; Dalgalı; Islak ve dalgalı; Yaki/afro düz; Diğer
fr: Texture des extensions capillaires: Crépu afro/torsadé afro; Brushing; Ondulé; Boho locs; Très frisé; Bouclé; Boucles serrées; Ondulations serrées; Dreadlocks/locs; Boucles italiennes; Jerry curl; Crépu bouclé; Ondulations profondes lâches; Ondulations lâches; Lisse soyeux; Spring twist; Lisse; Ondulations fluides; Ondulé; Effet mouillé ondulé; Lisse yaki/crépu; Autre
sk-SK: Textúra predlžovaných vlasov: Afro kinky/Afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho locs; Špirálovité; Kučeravé; Husto kučeravé; Výrazné vlny; Dready/lokne; Talianske kučery; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Voľné výrazné vlny; Voľné vlny; Hodvábne rovné; Spring twist; Rovné; Vodné vlny; Vlnité; Mokré a vlnité; Yaki/Kinky rovné; Iné
lt-LT: Plaukų priauginimo tekstūra: Afro stiliaus / susukti garbanoti; Išpūsti („Blow-out“); Laisvos bangos („Body wave“); „Boho“ stiliaus kaselės; Smulkiai garbanoti („Coily“); Garbanoti; Tankiai garbanoti („Deep curly“); Tankios bangos („Deep wave“); Dredi / kaselės; Itališko stiliaus garbanos; „Jerry curl“ garbanos; Labai smulkiai garbanoti („Kinky curly“); Laisvos tankios bangos; Laisvos bangos; Šilkiniai tiesūs; Spyruoklinės garbanos; Tiesūs; Vandens bangos; Banguoti; Šlapių plaukų efekto ir banguoti; „Yaki“ / tekstūruoti tiesūs; Kita
zh-CN: 接发纹理: 非洲小卷/非洲扭辫; 吹风直发; 大波浪; 波西米亚脏辫; 螺旋卷; 卷发; 深卷发; 深波浪; 脏辫; 意大利卷发; 杰里卷发; 极小卷发; 宽松深波浪; 宽松波浪; 丝滑直发; 弹簧扭辫; 直发; 水波纹; 波浪; 湿发与波浪发; 亚奇发/毛躁直发; 其他
vi: Kết cấu tóc nối: Xoăn xù/xoăn xoắn Phi; Duỗi phồng; Gợn sóng to; Tết lọn Boho; Xoăn lọn nhỏ; Xoăn; Xoăn sâu; Gợn sóng sâu; Tết lọn thừng; Xoăn kiểu Ý; Xoăn Jerry; Xoăn xù; Gợn sóng sâu lơi; Gợn sóng lơi; Thẳng mượt; Xoăn lò xo; Thẳng; Gợn sóng nước; Gợn sóng; Ướt & gợn sóng; Thẳng xù/Yaki; Khác
th: เท็กซ์เจอร์ของเส้นผมต่อ: แอฟโฟรคิงกี้/แอฟโฟรทวิสต์; โบลว์เอาต์; ลอนใหญ่; โบโฮล็อก; หยิกขอด; หยิก; หยิกมาก; ลอนคลื่นลึก; เดรดร็อก/ล็อกส์; อิตาเลียนเคิร์ล; เจอร์รีเคิร์ล; คิงกี้เคิร์ล; ลอนคลื่นลึกแบบคลาย; ลอนคลาย; ตรงสลวย; สปริงทวิสต์; ตรง; ลอนน้ำ; ลอนคลื่น; เว็ทแอนด์เวฟวี; ยากิ/คิงกี้สเตรท; อื่นๆ
de: Struktur der Haarverlängerung: Afro Kinky / Afro Twist; Blow-out; Body Wave; Boho Locs; Coily; Lockig; Deep Curly; Deep Wave; Dreads/Locs; Italian Curl; Jerry Curl; Kinky Curly; Loose Deep Wave; Loose Wave; Silky Straight; Spring Twist; Glatt; Water Wave; Wellig; Wet & Wavy; Yaki/Kinky Straight; Sonstige
da: Tekstur på hårforlængelser: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Krøllet; Deep curly; Deep wave; Dreadlocks/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Silkeagtigt glat; Spring twist; Glat; Water wave; Bølget; Wet & wavy; Yaki/kinky straight; Andet
es: Textura de extensiones de cabello: Afro rizado/afro twist; Alisado con secador; Ondulado suave; Rastas boho; Muy rizado; Rizado; Rizado profundo; Ondulado profundo; Rastas/dreadlocks; Rizado italiano; Rizado Jheri; Afro rizado; Ondulado profundo suelto; Ondulado suelto; Liso sedoso; Spring twist; Liso; Ondulado al agua; Ondulado; Efecto mojado y ondulado; Yaki/liso texturizado; Otra
pt-PT: textura de extensão de cabelo: Crespo/twist afro; Escovado; Ondulação larga; Rastas boho; Muito crespo; Encaracolado; Caracóis fechados; Ondas fechadas; Rastas; Caracóis italianos; Jerry curl; Crespo encaracolado; Ondas abertas marcadas; Ondas abertas; Liso sedoso; Spring twist; Liso; Ondas de água; Ondulado; Efeito molhado e ondulado; Yaki/crespo liso; Outro
bg-BG: Текстура за удължаване на косата: Афро къдрици/афро туист; Издухана коса; Леки вълни; Бохо расти; Ситни спираловидни къдрици; Къдрава; Силно къдрава; Дълбоки вълни; Расти/дредове; Италиански къдрици; Къдрици Джери; Афро ситни къдрици; Свободни дълбоки вълни; Свободни вълни; Копринено права; Пружинящи къдрици; Права; Водни вълни; Чуплива; Мокър ефект и вълни; Яки/афро права; Други
ja: ヘアエクステンションの質感: アフロキンキー/アフロツイスト; ブローアウト; ボディウェーブ; ボホロック; コイリー; カーリー; ディープカーリー; ディープウェーブ; ドレッド/ロックス; イタリアンカール; ジェリーカール; キンキーカーリー; ルーズディープウェーブ; ルーズウェーブ; シルキーストレート; スプリングツイスト; ストレート; ウォーターウェーブ; ウェービー; ウェット&ウェービー; ヤキ/キンキーストレート; その他
sv: Hårförlängningstextur: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Coily; Lockigt; Deep curly; Deep wave; Dreads/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Loose deep wave; Loose wave; Silky straight; Spring twist; Rakt; Water wave; Vågigt; Wet & wavy; Yaki/kinky straight; Övrigt
pt-BR: Extensão de cabelo textura: Afro kinky/afro twist; Blow-out; Ondulado solto (Body wave); Boho loc; Crespo (Coily); Cacheado (Curly); Cacho fechado (Deep curly); Ondulado fechado (Deep wave); Dreads/locs; Cacho italiano (Italian curl); Jerry curl; Crespo cacheado (Kinky curly); Ondulado fechado solto (Loose deep wave); Ondulado solto (Loose wave); Liso sedoso (Silky straight); Spring twist; Liso; Ondulado água (Water wave); Ondulado; Molhado e ondulado (Wet & wavy); Crespo alisado (Yaki/kinky straight); Outra
sl-SI: Tekstura lasnih podaljškov: Afro kodrasto/afro twist; Prepihano (Blow-out); Rahlo valovito; Boho locs; Izjemno kodrasto; Kodrasto; Globoko kodrasto; Globoko valovito; Dredi; Italijanski koder; Jerry koder; Skrepano kodrasto; Rahlo globoko valovito; Rahlo valovito; Svilnato ravno; Spring twist; Ravno; Vodno valovito; Valovito; Mokro in valovito; Yaki/skrepano ravno; Drugo
zh-TW: 接髮質地: 爆炸頭捲曲/扭辮; 吹直髮; 大波浪; 波西米亞雷鬼辮; 彈簧捲; 捲髮; 深捲; 深波浪; 雷鬼辮/髒辮; 義大利捲; 傑里捲; 密集捲; 寬鬆深波浪; 寬鬆波浪; 絲滑直髮; 彈簧扭辮; 直髮; 水波紋; 波浪; 濕波浪; Yaki/微捲直髮; 其他
hr-HR: Tekstura ekstenzije za kosu: Afro kinky / afro twist; Blow-out; Blagi valovi; Boho loc; Sitne kovrče; Kovrčava; Gusto kovrčava; Duboki valovi; Dreadlocksi/lokne; Talijanske kovrče; Jerry curl; Kinky kovrčava; Opušteni duboki valovi; Opušteni valovi; Svilenkasto ravna; Spring twist; Ravna; Vodeni valovi; Valovita; Mokra i valovita; Yaki / kinky ravna; Ostalo
nb: Tekstur av hårforlengelser: Afro kinky / afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Kveilet; Krøllete; Tette krøller; Dype bølger; Dreads/locs; Italian curl; Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Løse dype bølger; Løse bølger; Silkeglatt; Spring twist; Rett; Water wave; Bølgete; Vått og bølgete; Yaki / kinky straight; Annet
cs: Textura vlasových pásků: Afro kinky / afro twist; Blow-out; Body wave; Boho loc; Spirálovité (Coily); Kudrnaté; Silně kudrnaté (Deep curly); Hluboké vlny (Deep wave); Dready/lokny; Italské lokny (Italian curl); Jerry curl; Kinky curly; Volné hluboké vlny (Loose deep wave); Volné vlny (Loose wave); Hedvábně rovné; Spring twist; Rovné; Vodní vlny (Water wave); Vlnité; Wet & wavy; Yaki / kinky rovné; Jiná
hu: Hajhosszabbítás textúrája: Afro kinky / afro csavart; Beszárított; Laza hullámos; Bohém raszta; Aprógöndör; Göndör; Erősen göndör; Erősen hullámos; Raszta / tincses; Olasz göndör; Jheri göndör (Jerry curl); Kinky göndör; Laza, mély hullámos; Laza hullámos; Selymesen egyenes; Rugósan csavart; Egyenes; Vízhullámos; Hullámos; Vizes és hullámos; Yaki / kinky egyenes; Egyéb
ko: 헤어 익스텐션 질감: 아프로 킨키/아프로 트위스트; 블로우 아웃; 바디 웨이브; 보호 록; 코일리; 컬리; 딥 컬리; 딥 웨이브; 드레드/록스; 이탈리안 컬; 제리 컬; 킨키 컬리; 루즈 딥 웨이브; 루즈 웨이브; 실키 스트레이트; 스프링 트위스트; 스트레이트; 워터 웨이브; 웨이비; 웻 앤 웨이비; 야키/킨키 스트레이트; 기타
pl: Tekstura doczepianych włosów: Mocno kręcone afro / afro twist; Blow-out; Fale body wave; Boho locs; Sprężynki (coily); Kręcone; Głębokie loki; Głębokie fale; Dredy / dredloki; Włoskie loki; Jerry curl; Drobne sprężynki (kinky curly); Luźne głębokie fale; Luźne fale; Jedwabiście proste; Wiosenne skręty (spring twist); Proste; Fale wodne; Falowane; Efekt mokrych fal; Yaki / puszyste proste; Inne